Nevada, session 83, AB576.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
Highway Fund to the Nevada Highway Patrol Division of the
Department of Public Safety the sum of $185,819 for the
replacement of fleet motorcycles and associated special equipment.
Sec. 2. There is hereby appropriated from the State Highway
Fund to the Nevada Highway Patrol Division of the Department of
Public Safety the sum of $1,040,928 for the replacement of portable
radios and associated equipment.
Sec. 3. There is hereby appropriated from the State Highway
Fund to the Nevada Highway Patrol Division of the Department of
Public Safety the sum of $96,697 for the replacement of vehicle
hoists, a forklift and trailers.
Sec. 4. There is hereby appropriated from the State Highway
Fund to the Nevada Highway Patrol Division of the Department of
Public Safety the sum of $797,415 for the replacement of drones
and scales for commercial motor vehicles.
Sec. 5. There is hereby appropriated from the State Highway
Fund to the Nevada Highway Patrol Division of the Department of
Public Safety the sum of $77,540 for the purchase of first aid kits.
Sec. 6. There is hereby appropriated from the State Highway
Fund to the Nevada Highway Patrol Division of the Department of
Public Safety the sum of $467,500 for the purchase of electronic
flares.
Sec. 7. There is hereby appropriated from the State Highway
Fund to the Nevada Highway Patrol Division of the Department of
Public Safety the sum of $421,349 for the purchase of equipment
and associated ammunition.
Sec. 8. There is hereby appropriated from the State Highway
Fund to the Nevada Highway Patrol Division of the Department of
Public Safety the sum of $63,100 for the purchase of storage
containers.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 2 –
Sec. 9. Any remaining balance of an appropriation made by
sections 1 to 8, inclusive, of this act must not be committed for
expenditure after June 30, 2027, by the entity to which the
appropriation is made or any entity to which money from the
appropriation is granted or otherwise transferred in any manner, and
any portion of the appropriated money remaining must not be spent
for any purpose after September 17, 2027, by either the entity to
which the money was appropriated or the entity to which the money
was subsequently granted or transferred, and must be reverted to the
State Highway Fund on or before September 17, 2027.
Sec. 10. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
Highway Fund to the Nevada Highway Patrol Division of the
Department of Public Safety for the replacement of fleet vehicles
and associated special equipment the following sums:
For the Fiscal Year 2025-2026 ............................... $6,243,192
For the Fiscal Year 2026-2027 ............................... $5,174,646
2. Any balance of the sums appropriated by subsection 1
remaining at the end of the respective fiscal years must not be
committed for expenditure after June 30 of the respective fiscal
years by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity
to which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the appropriated
money remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, respectively, by
either the entity to which the money was appropriated or the entity
to which the money was subsequently granted or transferred, and
must be reverted to the State Highway Fund on or before
September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, respectively.
Sec. 11. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
Highway Fund to the Nevada Highway Patrol Division of the
Department of Public Safety for the replacement of mobile data
computers and associated equipment the following sums:
For the Fiscal Year 2025-2026 ............................... $1,281,579
For the Fiscal Year 2026-2027 .................................. $414,629
2. Any balance of the sums appropriated by subsection 1
remaining at the end of the respective fiscal years must not be
committed for expenditure after June 30 of the respective fiscal
years by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity
to which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the appropriated
money remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, respectively, by
either the entity to which the money was appropriated or the entity
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 3 –
to which the money was subsequently granted or transferred, and
must be reverted to the State Highway Fund on or before
September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, respectively.
Sec. 12. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
Highway Fund to the Nevada Highway Patrol Division of the
Department of Public Safety for the replacement of portable event
recording devices the following sums:
For the Fiscal Year 2025-2026 .................................. $891,831
For the Fiscal Year 2026-2027 ............................... $1,708,820
2. Any balance of the sums appropriated by subsection 1
remaining at the end of the respective fiscal years must not be
committed for expenditure after June 30 of the respective fiscal
years by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity
to which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the appropriated
money remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, respectively, by
either the entity to which the money was appropriated or the entity
to which the money was subsequently granted or transferred, and
must be reverted to the State Highway Fund on or before
September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, respectively.
Sec. 13. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)